North Dakota, session 69, SB2261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 57-38 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Prison industries workforce development credit.
1. A taxpayer that is a primary sector business, as defined in section 1 - 01 - 49, is allowed a
nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed under section 57 - 38 - 30 or 57 - 38 - 30.3 for the
cost of purchased components of final manufactured products or labor from prison industries.
The amount of the credit under this section is ten percent of the cost of components and labor
from prison industries purchased by the taxpayer in the calendar year. The credit must be
claimed for the taxable year in which the components or labor are purchased.
2. The credit under this section may not exceed the taxpayer's liability as determined under this
chapter for any taxable year. If the amount of the credit determined under this section exceeds
the liability for tax under this chapter, the excess may be carried forward to each of the next
five succeeding taxable years.
3. The aggregate amount of credits allowed each calendar year under this section may not
exceed forty-five thousand dollars. If the aggregate amount of credits claimed under this
section:
a. Is less than the limit under this subsection, any remaining unclaimed credits may be
carried forward and made available in the succeeding calendar year.
b. Exceeds the limit under this subsection, the tax commissioner shall prorate the credits
among the claimants.
4. If a taxpayer entitled to the credit provided by this section is a member of a group of
corporations filing a North Dakota consolidated tax return using the combined reporting
method, the credit may be claimed against the aggregate North Dakota tax liability of all of the
corporations included in the North Dakota consolidated return.
5. A passthrough entity entitled to the credit under this section must be considered to be the
taxpayer for purposes of this section and the amount of the credit allowed must be determined
at the passthrough entity level. The amount of the total credit determined at the passthrough
entity level must be allowed to the partners, shareholders, or members in proportion to their
respective interests in the passthrough entity. An individual taxpayer may claim the credit
passed through under this section against the individual's state income tax liability under
section 57 - 38 - 30.3 .
6. A taxpayer applying for a tax credit under this section for purchases in the preceding calendar
year shall provide the following information to the tax commissioner by January thirty-first of
each calendar year:

S. B. NO. 2261 - PAGE 2
a. The name, address, and federal identification number or social security number of the
taxpayer that made the purchase.
b. Substantiation of primary sector designation from the department of commerce division
of economic development and finance as of the date of the purchase or payment.
c. A copy of the paid invoice that identifies the components or labor purchased.
d. A description of the components or labor purchased.
7. After January thirty-first, the tax commissioner shall notify each applicant of the amount of tax
credit earned or allocated to the tax payer under subdivision b of subsection 3. Purchases
resulting in tax credits under this section may not be used in the calculation of any other
income tax deduction or credit allowed under this chapter.
8. The tax commissioner shall proscribe forms for the administration of this section.
SECTION 2. A new subdivision to subsection 7 of section 57-38-30.3 of the North Dakota Century
Code is created and enacted as follows:
Prison industries workforce development credit under section 1 of this Act .
SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - PRISON INDUSTRIES WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying
prison industries and workforce development programs for incarcerated individuals in the state,
including how prison industries can work in alignment with the manufacturing industry and other private
sector industries to further the mission of workforce development for incarcerated individuals and to
encourage positive outcomes for individuals exiting the criminal justice system. The legislative
management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation required to
implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act are effective for taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2024.

S. B. NO. 2261 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2261.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 3 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 56 Nays 33 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State

S. B. NO. 2261 - PAGE 4
Honorable Michael Howe
Secretary of State
Bismarck, North Dakota
I certify this Act, Senate Bill No. 2261, together with the objections of Governor Armstrong, was
returned to the Senate, being the body in which it originated, on March 24, 2025; that the objections of
the Governor were entered upon the Journal on March 24, 2025, and read at length; that the Bill was
taken up for reconsideration; that the motion for reconsideration prevailed on March 27, 2025, at
2:01 p.m.; and the roll was called and the Bill did pass, with more than two-thirds of the members-elect
voting in the affirmative.
Vote: Yeas 45
Nays 2
Absent and
not voting 0
____________________________
President of the Senate
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate

S. B. NO. 2261 - PAGE 5
Honorable Michael Howe
Secretary of State
Bismarck, North Dakota
I certify this Act, Senate Bill No. 2261, together with the objections of Governor Armstrong, was
received from the Senate, being the body in which it originated, on March 27, 2025; that the objections
of the Governor were read at length on April 2, 2025; that the Bill was taken up for reconsideration; that
the motion for reconsideration failed on April 3, 2025, at 3:05 p.m.; and the roll was called and the Bill
failed to pass, with less than two-thirds of the members-elect voting in the affirmative.
Vote: Yeas 15
Nays 78
Absent and
not voting 1
____________________________
Speaker of the House
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House